District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-309.03

Jurisdiction of Board.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 903, 32 DCR 7396
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 101(cc), 44 DCR 1423
Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 1702(b), 47 DCR 6308
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1189.3.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 1702(b) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1702(b) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).